Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5255YH (5) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2072 Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. a. Develop a policy that prohibits 3 the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics from including a 4 noncompete clause in an employment contract with a physician. 5 b. For purposes of this subsection: 6 (1) âNoncompete clauseâ means any restriction on the right 7 of a physician to practice in any geographic area or for a 8 defined period of time upon the termination of an employment 9 contract between the physician and the university of Iowa 10 hospitals and clinics. 11 (2) âPhysicianâ means an individual licensed under chapter 12 148. 13 c. This subsection applies to all employment contracts 14 between a physician and the university of Iowa hospitals and 15 clinics entered into, extended, or renewed on or after the 16 effective date of this Act. 17 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 18 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 19